Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-616
Crosswalk, defined.

Crosswalk shall mean:

(1) That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of such roadway measured from the curbs or, in the absence of curbs, from the edge of the roadway; or

(2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly designated by competent authority and marked for pedestrian crossing by lines, signs, or other devices.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 112.

Crosswalk defined and considered as worded in former section. Therkildsen v. Gottsch, 194 Neb. 729, 235 N.W.2d 622 (1975).